Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3488.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-166 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Student
Secular Bill of Rights".
B. As used in this act:

Req. No. 15621 Page 1

1. "Academic study of religion" means objective, educational
examination of religious traditions, texts, history, or practices
for secular scholarly purposes, conducted in a manner that neither
promotes nor denigrates any particular religious belief or
nonbelief.
2. "Club" means a noncurricular student group recognized by the
school district and that qualifies through the safe-haven provisions
under the federal Equal Access Act, 20 U.S.C., Section 4071(c).
3. "Coerce" means exerting direct or indirect pressure, whether
through official policy, practice, or conduct, that would compel a
reasonable student to participate in or refrain from religious
exercise against his or her conscience.
4. "Endorsement" means a governmental practice that a
reasonable observer would view as government approval, favor, or
disapproval of a religion or particular religious beliefs.
5. "Nonparticipatory capacity"" means presence at a student
religious club meeting or event solely for supervisory purposes, as
defined in the federal Equal Access Act, without lecturing,
proselytizing, praying, preaching, planning religious events, or
otherwise engaging in religious activities.
6. "Official capacity" means when a person is:
a. performing official duties or furthering the work of a
school district or school board, or

Req. No. 15621 Page 2

b. acting under or with power or authority granted by
virtue of employment by or association with a school
district or school board.
7. "Prayer" means a communication, either spoken or written,
directed toward a deity, deities, or other supernatural or spiritual
force, including but not limited to a benediction, invocation,
chant, or request for guidance, blessing, forgiveness, or
intervention.
8. "Proselytizing" means attempting to convert individuals from
one religion, religious belief, or nonbelief to another through
persuasion or inducement.
9. "Public official" means any elected official, appointed
official, or employee of a state or local unit of government,
including any employee of a public school district or public school
board.
10. "Public school" means any elementary or secondary
educational institution operated by the state, a political
subdivision thereof, including traditional public schools and public
charter schools.
11. "Religious activity" means any practice, observance, or
expression intended primarily for religious purposes, including but
not limited to prayer, worship, religious instruction, or
proselytizing.

Req. No. 15621 Page 3

12. "Religious display" means any visual presentation of
religious symbols, texts, imagery, or artifacts that conveys a
religious message or promotes religious beliefs.
13. "Religious text" means writing that is used primarily for
devotional, worship, or proselytizing purposes rather than for
legitimate academic study of religion, religious history, or
comparative religion.
14. "School event" means any activity at a school facility or
sponsored, conducted, or supervised by a school official acting in
official capacity. School event includes, but is not limited to,
graduation, grade-promotion ceremony, award program, induction
ceremony, pep rally, competition, practice, performance, class
instructional time, and club meeting or event. School event does
not include:
a. a student religious club meeting or event, if all
school employees and agents are only present at the
meeting or event in a nonparticipatory capacity,
b. an activity at a school facility, if it is outside the
presence of students and no school official acts in
official capacity, and
c. an activity at a school facility that is used by a
third party pursuant to a standard facility use
agreement or advance written permission that indicates
the responsible third-party user, use period, facility
Req. No. 15621 Page 4

to be used, purpose of use, and conditions of use,
provided such use occurs during the agreed period, is
on terms consistent with other third-party users,
involves no school official acting in official
capacity, and does not take place during school hours.
15. "School official" means any employee, agent, or
representative of a public school or school district, including but
not limited to teachers, administrators, coaches, and support staff.
16. "School property" means any building, facility, grounds, or
vehicle owned, leased, or controlled by a public school or school
district.
17. "Secular" means an objective that is not primarily
religious in nature and serves a legitimate educational,
administrative, or civic function.
C. All public school students shall have the right to:
1. Practice any religion they choose on school grounds or at
school events, provided that their practices are orderly, and do not
inhibit the operations or safety of the school or infringe on the
rights of others;
2. Not practice any religion whatsoever, if they so choose, on
school property or at school events;
3. Be free from discrimination based on their religious beliefs
or lack thereof;

Req. No. 15621 Page 5

4. Be free from school-sponsored religious teachings or
practices of all kinds on school property or at school events
including, but not limited to:
a. staff-led prayer,
b. prayer led by non-staff adults or students, when it is
sponsored by the school or supported by the school by
means of marketing, planning, audio-visual equipment,
or endorsement by any member of school staff or the
school itself,
c. any religious instruction as part of a school
curriculum, including creationism and intelligent
design, and
d. required or coerced reading of religious texts other
than for the academic study of religion. Any academic
study of religion that includes instruction of
religious perspectives shall include multiple
religious perspectives;
5. a. Be free of school-sponsored religious displays on
school property or at school events including, but not
limited to:
(1) the Ten Commandments and similar statements of
religious doctrine,
(2) the Christian cross, the Star of David, the Star
and Crescent of Islam, and similar symbols, and
Req. No. 15621 Page 6

(3) depictions of holy figures, prophets, or
spiritual leaders for the purpose of promoting
religious adherence,
b. This paragraph shall not apply to:
(1) de minimis wardrobe items such as necklaces,
rings, or headdresses, or
(2) displays in a private office area, so long as the
display is not obvious to students or the public.
6. Be free from school-sponsored religious messaging on school
property or at school events, including at school assemblies and in
the classroom. This paragraph does not prohibit student-created
religious expression in individual assignments or projects, so long
as the work addresses the learning objectives required by the
curriculum, or reasonable accommodation of religious practices,
including:
a. reasonable scheduling accommodations for religious
observances,
b. dietary accommodations consistent with religious
requirements,
c. styling of hair or personal grooming practices
consistent with religious or cultural practices,
d. wearing of religious items, jewelry, and regalia,
including indigenous traditional regalia and religious
items, and
Req. No. 15621 Page 7

e. any personal expression of religious practices, or of
nonbelief, provided it does not interfere with the
rights of others or the safe and normal functioning of
the school, and provided it is not done by school
staff operating in their official capacity;
7. Refuse to engage in religious discussions or otherwise
reject unwanted proselytizing by other students; and
8. Be free from incentives, offered from either the school or
school staff, to participate in religious activities during school
hours facilitated by third-party organizations including, but not
limited to, through the offer of money, food, school supplies, or
other items not otherwise available in the school.
D. Each public school district shall establish a formal
grievance procedure for students, parents, and staff to report
violations of this act. Complaints shall be acknowledged in writing
within seven (7) days and shall be investigated within thirty (30)
days. A written determination and an action plan identifying
necessary and specific steps to remediate any violations found shall
be issued by the district immediately following the investigation,
and within forty (40) days of receiving the complaint. Complainants
shall have the right to appeal a final decision of the school
district to the State Department of Education.
E. 1. Any student or parent of a student who alleges a
violation of this act may bring a civil action in a court of
Req. No. 15621 Page 8

comp etent jurisdiction for declaratory, monetary, and injunctive
relief. Courts may award reasonable attorney fees and costs to
prevailing plaintiffs, which includes plaintiffs awarded nominal
damages and plaintiffs that receive a preliminary injunction prior
to a case being dismissed.
2. No qualified or "good-faith" immunity shall apply to public
officials who knowingly violate the provisions of this act.
3. Actions under this act shall be brought within two (2) years
of the date of the alleged violation.
4. For purposes of enforcing this act, any student currently
enrolled or who was enrolled in a public school at the time of the
alleged violation, or his or her parent or guardian, shall have
standing to bring suit, without having to demonstrate any economic
injury.
5. No public school employee shall be subject to discipline or
retaliation for reporting, in good-faith, a violation of this act.
F. 1. The State Department of Education shall develop and
provide training materials, model policies, and guidance documents
to school districts for purposes of training school officials in
compliance with this act and to assist local implementation.
2. The State Department of Education shall issue guidance to
school districts within sixty (60) days of the effective date of
this act. School districts shall have one hundred twenty (120) days
to review and revise local policies for compliance. Training
Req. No. 15621 Page 9

requ irements shall be implemented beginning with the 2026-2027
school year.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-15621 SW 01/05/26















Req. No. 15621 Page 10